Massachusetts, session 194th, H2884.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Part 1, Title IV, Chapter 31, Section 26, of the Massachusetts General Laws is hereby
amended by striking out in line 7 of paragraph 1 "(4) all others," and inserting the words " (4)
member of the Massachusetts National Guard or Reserves of the United States Armed Forces
with no less than two years of continuous service; (5) all others,"
of 1